Texas statutes.
AGRICULTURE CODE

TITLE 3. AGRICULTURAL RESEARCH AND PROMOTION

CHAPTER 50C. TEXAS ORGANIC AGRICULTURAL INDUSTRY ADVISORY BOARD

Sec. 50C.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "board" means the Texas Organic Agricultural Industry Advisory Board.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 477 (H.B. 2345), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 50C.002. COMPOSITION. (a) The board is composed of the following 13 members appointed by the commissioner:

(1) four members who produce organic agricultural products;

(2) two members who are retail sellers of organic agricultural products;

(3) one member who distributes organic agricultural products;

(4) one member who processes organic agricultural products;

(5) one member who represents a Texas trade association that represents the organic agricultural industry;

(6) one member who represents the Texas Cooperative Extension;

(7) one technical advisor member who is employed by an institution of higher education, as defined by Section 61.003, Education Code, or government agency as a researcher or instructor:

(A) in the field of organic agriculture products or sustainable agriculture; or

(B) who has technical expertise in soil biology, agronomy, entomology, horticulture, or organic farming systems;

(8) one member who represents the public; and

(9) one representative from the department.

(b) The board shall elect a presiding officer from among its members.

(c) Members of the board serve staggered terms of four years, with either six or seven members' terms, as applicable, expiring February 1 of each odd-numbered year. Members may be reappointed at the end of a term.

(d) Chapter 2110, Government Code, does not apply to the size, composition, or duration of the board.

(e) Service on the board by a state officer or employee is an additional duty of the member's office or employment. Members of the board are not entitled to compensation or reimbursement of expenses.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 477 (H.B. 2345), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 50C.003. DUTIES.The board shall:

(1) assist the department in:

(A) assessing the state of the organic agricultural products industry in this state;

(B) developing recommendations to the commissioner and the legislature to promote and expand the organic agricultural products industry in this state;

(C) identifying and obtaining grants and gifts to promote and expand the organic agricultural products industry in this state; and

(D) developing a statewide organic agricultural products education and awareness campaign that:

(i) utilizes the Texas Cooperative Extension's educational programs and channels of distribution, when appropriate;

(ii) is consistent with Sections 2.002 and 12.002 and any department policies relating to the promotion of Texas agriculture and agricultural products; and

(iii) does not refer negatively to any other agriculture process that is used or to any agricultural product that is grown or sold in this state; and

(2) review and provide guidance on rules impacting the organic agricultural products industry in this state.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 477 (H.B. 2345), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 50C.004. MEETINGS. The board shall meet at least once each year and may meet at other times considered necessary by the commissioner.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 477 (H.B. 2345), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 50C.005. STAFF. The board is administratively attached to the department. The department shall provide the board with the staff necessary to carry out its duties under this chapter.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 477 (H.B. 2345), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.